test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-mow_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - mow - ok : # Wolvengrey VTA1 verb - p 401

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: nimowâw
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: kimowâw
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: nimowânân
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: kimowânaw
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: kimowâwâw
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+3SgO: mowêw
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3SgO: mowêwak
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: nimowâwak
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: kimowâwak
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: nimowânânak
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: kimowânawak
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: kimowâwâwak
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+3PlO: mowêw
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3PlO: mowêwak

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+4SgO: mowêyiwa
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+4PlO: mowêyiwa     

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: kimowin
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+1PlO: kimowinân
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+1PlO: kimowinân
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: kimowinâwâw

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: nimowik
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: kimowik
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: nimowikonân # inv +0Sg+1PlO
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: kimowikonaw
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: kimowikowâw

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: nimowikwak
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: kimowikwak
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: nimowikonânak
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: kimowikonawak
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: kimowikowâwak
     
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+3SgO: mowik
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+3PlO: mowikwak
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+5Sg+4SgO: mowikoyiwa

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: kimowitin
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+2SgO: kimowitinân
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+2PlO: kimowitinân
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: kimowitinânâw

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+3SgO: [nikîmowâw, nikî-mowâw]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+3SgO: [kikîmowâw, kikî-mowâw]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+3SgO: [nikîmowânân, nikî-mowânân]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+12Pl+3SgO: [kikîmowânaw, kikî-mowânaw]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+3SgO: [kikîmowâwâw, kikî-mowâwâw]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+3SgO: [kîmowêw, kî-mowêw]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+3SgO: [kîmowêwak, kî-mowêwak]

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+3PlO: [nikîmowâwak, nikî-mowâwak]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+3PlO: [kikîmowâwak, kikî-mowâwak]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+3PlO: [nikîmowânânak, nikî-mowânânak]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+12Pl+3PlO: [kikîmowânawak, kikî-mowânawak]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+3PlO: [kikîmowâwâwak, kikî-mowâwâwak]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+3PlO: [kîmowêw, kî-mowêw]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+3PlO: [kîmowêwak, kî-mowêwak]

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+4Sg+4SgO: [kîmowêyiwa, kî-mowêyiwa]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+4Sg+4PlO: [kîmowêyiwa, kî-mowêyiwa]

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+1SgO: [kikîmowin, kikî-mowin]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+1PlO: [kikîmowinân, kikî-mowinân]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+1PlO: [kikîmowinân, kikî-mowinân]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+1SgO: [kikîmowinâwâw, kikî-mowinâwâw]

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+1SgO: [nikîmowik, nikî-mowik]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+2SgO: [kikîmowik, kikî-mowik]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+1PlO: [nikîmowikonân, nikî-mowikonân]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+12PlO: [kikîmowikonaw, kikî-mowikonaw]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+2PlO: [kikîmowikowâw, kikî-mowikowâw]

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+1SgO: [nikîmowikwak, nikî-mowikwak]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+2SgO: [kikîmowikwak, kikî-mowikwak]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+1PlO: [nikîmowikonânak, nikî-mowikonânak]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+12PlO: [kikîmowikonawak, kikî-mowikonawak]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+2PlO: [kikîmowikowâwak, kikî-mowikowâwak]

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+4Sg+3SgO: [kîmowik, kî-mowik]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+4Sg+3PlO: [kîmowikwak, kî-mowikwak]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+5Sg+4SgO: [kîmowikoyiwa, kî-mowikoyiwa]

     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+2SgO: [kikîmowitin, kikî-mowitin]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+2SgO: [kikîmowitinân, kikî-mowitinân]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+2PlO: [kikîmowitinân, kikî-mowitinân]
     mowêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+2PlO: [kikîmowitinânâw, kikî-mowitinânâw]

     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: [ê-mowak, êmowak]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: [ê-mowat, êmowat]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: [ê-mowâyâhk, êmowâyâhk]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: [ê-mowâyahk, êmowâyahk]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: [ê-mowâyêk, êmowâyêk]

     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: [ê-mowakik, êmowakik]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: [ê-mowacik, êmowacik]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: [ê-mowâyâhkik, êmowâyâhkik]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: [ê-mowâyâhkok, êmowâyâhkok]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: [ê-mowâyêkok, êmowâyêkok]

     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4SgO: [ê-mowât, êmowât]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4SgO: [ê-mowâcik, êmowâcik]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4PlO: [ê-mowât, êmowât]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4PlO: [ê-mowâcik, êmowâcik]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+5SgO: [ê-mowâyit, êmowâyit]
  
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: [ê-mowiyan, êmowiyan]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1PlO: [ê-mowiyâhk, êmowiyâhk]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1PlO: [ê-mowiyâhk, êmowiyâhk]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: [ê-mowiyêk, êmowiyêk]

     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: [ê-mowit, êmowit]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: [ê-mowisk, êmowisk]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: [ê-mowikoyâhk, êmowikoyâhk]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: [ê-mowikoyahk, êmowikoyahk]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: [ê-mowikoyek, êmowikoyek]

     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: [ê-mowiticik, êmowiticik]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: [ê-mowiskik, êmowiskik]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: [ê-mowikoyâhkik, êmowikoyâhkik]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: [ê-mowikoyahkok, êmowikoyahkok]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: [ê-mowikoyêkok, êmowikoyêkok]

     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+3SgO: [ê-mowikot, êmowikot]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+3PlO: [ê-mowikocik, êmowikocik]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+4PlO: [ê-mowikoyit, êmowikoyit]

     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: [ê-mowitân, êmowitân]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2SgO: [ê-mowitâhk, êmowitâhk]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2PlO: [ê-mowitâhk, êmowitâhk]
     mowêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: [ê-mowitakok, êmowitakok]

     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: mow
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO: mowâtân
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO: mowihk
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO: mowik
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO: mowâtânik
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO: mowihkok

     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO: mowâhkan
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO: mowâhkahk
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO: mowâhkêk
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO: mowâhkanik
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO: mowâhkahkok
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO: mowâhkêkok

     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO: mowin
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1PlO: mowinân
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO: mowik
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO: mowîhkan
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1PlO: mowîhkâhk
     mowêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO: mowîhkêk

     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3SgO: mowaki
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3PlO: mowakwâwi
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3SgO: mowâyâhki
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3PlO: mowâyâhkwâwi
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3SgO: mowâyâhko
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3PlO: mowâyâhkwâwi

     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3SgO: mowaci
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3PlO: mowatwâwi
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3SgO: mowâyêko
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3PlO: mowâyêkwâwi

     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+3SgO: mowâci
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+4SgO: mowâyici
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+3PlO: mowikotwâwi
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1SgO: mowici
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2SgO: mowiski
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1PlO: mowikoyâhki
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2PlO: mowikoyêko
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+12PlO: mowikoyahko

     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+3SgO: mowâtwâwi
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+3PlO: mowâtwâwi

     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg+3SgO: mowikoci
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg+3PlO: mowâyici
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Pl+3SgO: mowikoci
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Pl+3PlO: mowâyici
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg+4PlO: mowikoyici
     mowêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Pl+4PlO: mowikoyici
